InanimHalNoun.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +Anim +Inanim +Indef +Nom +Acc +Dat +GenLoc +InstrAbl +Voc +Sg +Pl +Indef ^GUESSSTEMA ^GUESSSTEMAA ^GUESSSTEMC

LEXICON Root
InanimHalStem;

LEXICON InanimHalStem

පිල InanimHalNoun;
ගස InanimHalNoun;
නිදහස InanimHalNoun;
කොටස InanimHalNoun;
නම InanimHalNoun;
එක InanimHalNoun;
වයස InanimHalNoun;
වැඩසටහන InanimHalNoun;
රෝහල InanimHalNoun;
ගම InanimHalNoun;
සම්පත InanimHalNoun;
පළාත InanimHalNoun;

LEXICON InanimHalNoun
්+N+Acc+Pl+Anim:්  #;
්+N+Acc+Sg+Anim: #;
්+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:ට #;
්+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:ටම #;
්+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:ක #;
්+N+Dat+Pl+Anim:කට #;
්+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Inanim:ින් #;
්+N+Voc+Sg+Anim:ේ #;
්+N+Voc+Sg+Anim:ේදී  #;
්+N+Voc+Sg+Anim:‌ෙහි  #;
්+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:ේත් #;
්+N+Nom+Indef+Sg:ක් #;
්+N+Nom+Indef+Sg:ම #;
්+N+Nom+Indef+Sg:ත් #;
්+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Inanim:්වල #;
්+N+Dat+Pl+Inanim:්වලට #
්+N+Dat+Pl+Inanim:්වලත්   #
්+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Inanim:්වලින් #
්+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Inanim:්වල්වලින් #;
්+N+GenLoc+Sg+Inanim:්වල්වල #;
